Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 808.1 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
SB1595 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. 1. No agency, entity, or instrumentality of this state, or
entity contracted with such, shall provide specific recommendations
in favor of or against a commercial driver training school in this
state.
2. A violation of the provisions of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall be a cause of civil action for the commercial
driver training school affected by such violation against the
violating agency, entity, or instrumentality, or entity contracted
with such.
B. 1. No agency, entity, or instrumentality of this state, or
entity contracted with such, that administers grants for students of
commercial driver training schools in this state shall withhold such
grants based on the student’s choice of a specific school.
2. A violation of the provisions of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall be a cause of civil action for the commercial
driver training school or student affected by such violation against
the violating agency, entity, or instrumentality, or entity
contracted with such.
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any
commercial driver training school administered by the Oklahoma
Department of Corrections.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
SB1595 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 04/16/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.




















SB1595 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.